Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.21.020 and 2002 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Aircraft noise and air quality mitigation allocation" means an amount equal to the rate of the tax on petroleum products under RCW 82.21.030(1)(b) in excess of $1.48 per barrel, multiplied by the number of barrels of aviation fuel.(2) "Aviation fuel" has the same meaning as "aircraft fuel" as provided in RCW 82.42.010.(3) "Hazardous substance" means:(a) Any substance that, on March 1, 2002, is a hazardous substance under section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601(14), as amended by Public Law 99-499 on October 17, 1986, except that hazardous substance does not include the following noncompound metals when in solid form in a particle larger than one hundred micrometers (0.004 inches) in diameter: Antimony, arsenic, beryllium, cadmium, chromium, copper, lead, nickel, selenium, silver, thallium, or zinc;(b) Petroleum products;(c) Any pesticide product required to be registered under section 136a of the federal insecticide, fungicide and rodenticide act, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq., as amended by Public Law 104-170 on August 3, 1996; and(d) Any other substance, category of substance, and any product or category of product determined by the director of ecology by rule to present a threat to human health or the environment if released into the environment. The director of ecology shall not add or delete substances from this definition more often than twice during each calendar year. For tax purposes, changes in this definition shall take effect on the first day of the next month that is at least thirty days after the effective date of the rule. The word "product" or "products" as used in this ((paragraph))subsection (3)(d) means an item or items containing both: (i) One or more substances that are hazardous substances under (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection or that are substances or categories of substances determined under this ((paragraph))subsection (3)(d) to present a threat to human health or the environment if released into the environment; and (ii) one or more substances that are not hazardous substances.(((2)))(4) "Petroleum product" means plant condensate, lubricating oil, gasoline, aviation fuel, kerosene, diesel motor fuel, benzol, fuel oil, residual oil, liquefied or liquefiable gases such as butane, ethane, and propane, and every other product derived from the refining of crude oil, but the term does not include crude oil.(((3)))(5) "Possession" means the control of a hazardous substance located within this state and includes both actual and constructive possession. "Actual possession" occurs when the person with control has physical possession. "Constructive possession" occurs when the person with control does not have physical possession. "Control" means the power to sell or use a hazardous substance or to authorize the sale or use by another.(((4)))(6) "Previously taxed hazardous substance" means a hazardous substance in respect to which a tax has been paid under this chapter and which has not been remanufactured or reprocessed in any manner (other than mere repackaging or recycling for beneficial reuse) since the tax was paid.(((5)))(7) "Wholesale value" means fair market wholesale value, determined as nearly as possible according to the wholesale selling price at the place of use of similar substances of like quality and character, in accordance with rules of the department.(((6)))(8) Except for terms defined in this section, the definitions in chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW apply to this chapter.Sec. 2. RCW 82.21.030 and 2023 c 68 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A tax is imposed on the privilege of possession of hazardous substances in this state. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the rate of the tax is seven-tenths of one percent multiplied by the wholesale value of the substance. Moneys collected under this subsection (1)(a) must be deposited in the model toxics control capital account.(b) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, the rate of the tax on petroleum products is $1.09 per barrel. For subsequent fiscal years, the rate of tax on petroleum products is determined pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The tax collected under this subsection (1)(b) on petroleum products must be deposited as follows, after first depositing the tax as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection, except that during the 2021-2023 biennium the deposit as provided in (c) of this subsection may be prorated equally across each month of the biennium:(i) Sixty percent to the model toxics control operating account created under RCW 70A.305.180;(ii) Twenty-five percent to the model toxics control capital account created under RCW 70A.305.190; and(iii) Fifteen percent to the model toxics control stormwater account created under RCW 70A.305.200.(c) Until the beginning of the ensuing biennium after the enactment of an additive transportation funding act, $50,000,000 per biennium to the motor vehicle fund to be used exclusively for transportation stormwater activities and projects. For purposes of this subsection, "additive transportation funding act" means an act enacted after June 30, 2023, in which the combined total of new revenues deposited into the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation account exceed $2,000,000,000 per biennium attributable solely to an increase in revenue from the enactment of the act.(d) Beginning with taxes collected on or after October 1, 2026, the portion of tax collected under (b) of this subsection (1) constituting the aircraft noise and air quality mitigation allocation must be deposited in the state aircraft noise and air quality mitigation account created in section 3 of this act.(e) The department must compile a list of petroleum products that are not easily measured on a per barrel basis. Petroleum products identified on the list are subject to the rate under (a) of this subsection in lieu of the volumetric rate under (b) of this subsection. The list will be made in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must be made available on the department's internet website. In compiling the list, the department may accept technical assistance from persons that sell, market, or distribute petroleum products and consider any other resource the department finds useful in compiling the list.(2) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this chapter. The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the tax imposed in this chapter.(3) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, the rate of tax on petroleum products for the previous fiscal year must be adjusted to reflect the percentage change in the implicit price deflator for nonresidential structures as published by the United States department of commerce, bureau of economic analysis for the most recent 12-month period ending December 31st of the prior year.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 53.20 RCW to read as follows:The state aircraft noise and air quality mitigation account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.21.030(1)(d) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the department of commerce to establish a grant program to fund mitigation strategies within aviation-impacted communities related to aviation-related air quality impacts and aviation-related noise impacts. For the purposes of this section, "aviation-impacted communities" means communities located within 10 miles of an airport runway operated by a port district authorized to undertake programs for the abatement of aircraft noise under RCW 53.54.010.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 82.21 RCW to read as follows:Taxpayers subject to tax under this chapter on the possession of aviation fuel must report the quantity of barrels and tax due on a separate line as required by the department.--- END ---